Maryland, session 2026, HB0419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Transportation shall conduct a comprehensive
traffic safety audit of Maryland Route 202 and Maryland Route 704 in Prince George’s
County.
(b) The comprehensive traffic safety audit under subsection (a) of this section
shall:
(1) include strategies for improving roadway safety for drivers and
passengers of motor vehicles, bicyclists, and pedestrians;
(2) include data on crash history and overall trends in traffic risks;
(3) identify safety needs and deficiencies in infrastructure, engineering,
traffic control, and traffic operations;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0419*

HOUSE BILL 419
(4) recommend appropriate corrective actions and crash reduction
countermeasures with a focus on projects that can be implemented quickly to improve
safety; and
(5) include community input on improving roadway safety.
(c) On or before December 31, 2026, the Department shall report the findings and
recommendations resulting from the comprehensive traffic safety audit under subsection
(a) of this section to the Prince George’s County Delegation to the General Assembly in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.